Florida, session 2026, SB1130.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 84 85 Section 1.âSection 627.4193, Florida Statutes, is created 86 to read: 87 627.4193âRestrictions on health insurance reimbursement 88 downcoding.â 89 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 90 (a)ââDowncodeâ or âdowncodingâ means the alteration by a 91 payment adjudicator of a service code to another service code or 92 the alteration, addition, or deletion by a payment adjudicator 93 of a modifier, when the changed code or modifier is associated 94 with a lower payment amount than the service code or modifier 95 billed by the provider or facility. 96 (b)ââHealth insurerâ means any entity that offers health 97 insurance coverage, whether through a fully insured plan or 98 self-insured plan or fund, including, as applicable: 99 1.âAn authorized health insurer offering health insurance 100 as defined in s. 624.603, as well as any entity that offers a 101 commercial self-insurance fund as defined in s. 624.462(2) or 102 group self-insurance fund as described in s. 624.4621. 103 2.âA health insurer that is subject to any provision of 104 this chapter, as well as any entity that offers a self-insurance 105 plan or a group self-insurance plan. 106 3.âA managed care plan as defined in s. 409.962. 107 4.âA health maintenance organization as defined in s. 108 641.19. 109 (c)ââMedical recordâ means the comprehensive collection of 110 documentation, including clinical notes, diagnostic reports, and 111 other relevant information, which supports the health care 112 services provided. 113 (d) âParticipation agreementâ means a written contract or 114 agreement between a health insurer and a provider which outlines 115 the terms and conditions of participation, reimbursement rates, 116 and other relevant details. 117 (e)ââPayment adjudicatorâ means a health insurer or any 118 entity that provides, offers to provide, or administers payment 119 on behalf of a health insurer, as well any pharmacy benefit 120 manager as defined in s. 624.490(1), and any other individual or 121 entity that provides, offers to provide, or administers payment 122 for hospital services, outpatient services, medical services, 123 prescription drugs, or other health care services to a person 124 treated by a health care professional or facility in this state 125 under a policy, plan, or contract. 126 (f)ââProviderâ means any health care professional, 127 facility, or entity that submits claims for reimbursement for 128 covered health care services. 129 (2)âPayment adjudicators are prohibited from downcoding a 130 health care service billed by, or on behalf of, a provider, if 131 the health care service was ordered by a provider that is in 132 network with the applicable health insurer, unless such 133 downcoding is otherwise expressly permitted under the 134 participation agreement between the health insurer and the 135 provider. 136 (3)âIf downcoding is expressly permitted under the 137 participation agreement, the payment adjudicator must provide 138 the following information to the provider before making its 139 initial payment or notice of denial of payment: 140 (a)âA statement indicating that the service code or 141 modifier billed by the provider or facility will be downcoded. 142 (b)âAn explanation detailing the reasons for downcoding the 143 claim. This explanation must include a clear description of the 144 service codes or modifiers that were altered, added, or deleted, 145 if applicable. 146 (c)âThe payment amount that the payment adjudicator would 147 otherwise make if the service code or modifier is not downcoded. 148 (d)âA statement that the provider may contest the 149 downcoding of the applicable service code or modifier by filing 150 a contestation with the payment adjudicator with respect to the 151 downcoding within 15 days after receipt of the notice of 152 downcoding. 153 (e)âA statement that by contesting the downcoding of the 154 applicable service code or modifier, the provider does not waive 155 any of its legal rights and claims against the health insurer or 156 payment adjudicator to the fullest extent permissible under law. 157 (4)âEven if the participation agreement expressly permits 158 downcoding, a payment adjudicator is prohibited from downcoding 159 a service without first conducting a review of the associated 160 medical record to ensure the accuracy of the coding change. 161 (5)âA payment adjudicator is prohibited from downcoding for 162 orders by a licensed nurse. 163 (6)âNotwithstanding any provision in this section, a 164 payment adjudicator that proceeds to downcode a service code or 165 modifier, regardless of whether such downcoding is contested by 166 the provider, is solely responsible for any violations of law 167 associated with such downcoding. 168 (7)âPayment adjudicators are required to maintain clear and 169 accessible downcoding policies on their official website. These 170 policies must include: 171 (a)âAn overview of the circumstances under which downcoding 172 may occur. 173 (b)âThe process and criteria used for conducting reviews of 174 downcoded claims, including the role of medical record review. 175 (c)âInformation about the internal mechanisms for ensuring 176 consistency and accuracy in downcoding practices. 177 (d)âInformation regarding the processes for contesting with 178 the payment adjudicator the downcoding of a service code, which 179 processes must offer appeal rights for the provider and the 180 patient, and peer review by a licensed physician before the 181 downcoding. 182 (8)âHealth insurers shall ensure that their downcoding 183 policies are updated as needed to reflect any changes in 184 regulations, industry standards, or internal procedures. 185 (9)âHealth insurers shall ensure compliance with this 186 section and shall develop internal procedures to implement and 187 adhere to the requirements outlined in this section. 188 (10)âRegulatory authorities, including, but not limited to, 189 the Office of Insurance Regulation, may investigate and take 190 appropriate actions in cases of noncompliance with this section. 191 (11)âWhen a particular health care service is ordered by a 192 licensed physician, there is a presumption that the physicianâs 193 determination regarding the diagnosis of the patient and any 194 service order by the physician is correct and sufficient, absent 195 a coding error which the health insurer must first verify with 196 the physician before downcoding for such error. 197 (12)âIf an applicable court, arbitration tribunal, or other 198 binding legal process determines that a claim was subject to an 199 inappropriate or impermissible downcoding, whether in breach of 200 contract, statute, common law, or otherwise, such that 201 nonpayment or underpayment of the original claim has occurred, 202 then in accordance with s. 627.6131, interest must be calculated 203 on the full total amount that should have been paid on the claim 204 as of the applicable time period for payment specified in s. 205 627.6131. 206 (13)âFor a violation of this section, a provider shall have 207 a private cause of action to proceed against the health insurer 208 or payment adjudicator in the applicable tribunal for the 209 violation. 210 Section 2.âSection 627.42392, Florida Statutes, is amended 211 to read: 212 627.42392âPrior authorization.â 213 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 214 (a)ââAdverse determinationâ means a decision by a health 215 insurer or utilization review entity that the health care 216 services rendered, or proposed to be rendered, to a patient are 217 denied, reduced, or terminated. The term does not include a 218 decision to deny, reduce, or terminate services that are 219 determined to have been billed in duplicate bills or that are 220 confirmed with the provider to have been billed in error. 221 (b)ââElectronic prior authorization processâ does not 222 include transmissions through a facsimile machine. 223 (c)ââEmergency health care serviceâ means medical 224 screening, examination, and evaluation by a physician, or, to 225 the extent permitted by applicable law, by other appropriate 226 personnel under the supervision of a physician, to determine 227 whether an emergency medical condition exists and, if it does, 228 the care, treatment, or surgery by a physician necessary to 229 relieve or eliminate the emergency medical condition, within the 230 service capability of the facility. 231 (d)ââEmergency medical conditionâ means a medical condition 232 manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, 233 including severe pain, such that a prudent layperson who 234 possesses an average knowledge of health and medicine could 235 reasonably expect the absence of immediate medical attention to 236 result in any of the conditions listed in s. 395.002(8). 237 (e)ââHealth insurerâ means any entity that offers health 238 insurance coverage, whether through a fully insured plan or 239 self-insured plan or fund, including, as applicable: 240 1.âAn authorized health insurer offering health insurance 241 as defined in s. 624.603, as well as any entity that offers a 242 commercial self-insurance fund as defined in s. 624.462(2) or a 243 group self-insurance fund as described in s. 624.4621. 244 2.âA health insurer that is subject to any provision of 245 this chapter, as well as any entity that offers a self-insurance 246 plan or a group self-insurance plan. 247 3.âA managed care plan as defined in s. 409.962. 248 4.âA health maintenance organization as defined in s. 249 641.19. 250 (f)ââPrior authorizationâ means the process by which 251 utilization review entities determine the medical necessity or 252 medical appropriateness of otherwise covered health care 253 services before the rendering of such health care services. The 254 term also includes any requirement by a health insurer or 255 utilization review entity that an enrollee or a health care 256 provider notify the health insurer or utilization review entity 257 before the provision of a health care service. 258 (g)ââUrgent health care serviceâ means a health care 259 service that, if the timeframe for making a nonexpedited prior 260 authorization is applied, could, in the opinion of a physician 261 with knowledge of the patientâs medical condition: 262 1.âSeriously jeopardize the life or health of the patient 263 or the ability of the patient to regain maximum function; or 264 2.âSubject the patient to severe pain that cannot be 265 adequately managed without the care, treatment, or prescription 266 drugs that are the subject of the prior authorization request. 267 (h)ââUtilization review activityâ means any activity 268 prospective to, concurrent with, or retrospective to the 269 provision of a nonemergency health care service, to determine 270 whether payment must be made in full or is subject to an adverse 271 determination. Utilization review activity is prohibited: 272 1.âTo the extent restricted or prohibited by an agreement 273 with a health care provider; 274 2.âFor an emergency health care service; or 275 3.âFor a service provided to a patient experiencing an 276 emergency medical condition. 277 (i)ââUtilization review entityâ means an entity permitted 278 under the applicable agreement with a health care provider or 279 otherwise permitted by a provider that does not have such an 280 agreement to perform utilization review activities or upon whose 281 behalf utilization review activities are performed, including, 282 as applicable: 283 1.âAn authorized health insurer offering health insurance 284 as defined in s. 624.603, as well as any entity that offers a 285 commercial self-insurance fund as defined in s. 624.462(2) or 286 group self-insurance fund as described in s. 624.4621. 287 2.âA health insurer that is subject to any provision of 288 this chapter, as well as any entity that offers a self-insurance 289 plan or a group self-insurance plan. 290 3.âA managed care plan as defined in s. 409.962. 291 4.âA health maintenance organization as defined in s. 292 641.19. 293 5.âA pharmacy benefit manager as defined in s. 624.490(1). 294 6.âAny other individual or entity that provides, offers to 295 provide, or administers payment for hospital services, 296 outpatient services, medical services, prescription drugs, or 297 other health care services to a person treated by a health care 298 professional or facility in this state under a policy, plan, 299 contract, or fund âhealth insurerâ means an authorized insurer 300 offering health insurance as defined in s. 624.603, a managed 301 care plan as defined in s. 409.962(10), or a health maintenance 302 organization as defined in s. 641.19(12). 303 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a 304 utilization review entity that effective January 1, 2017, or six 305 (6) months after the effective date of the rule adopting the 306 prior authorization form, whichever is later, a health insurer, 307 or a pharmacy benefits manager on behalf of the health insurer, 308 which does not provide an electronic prior authorization process 309 for use by its contracted providers may, shall only use the 310 prior authorization form that has been approved by the Financial 311 Services Commission for granting a prior authorization for a 312 medical procedure, course of treatment, or prescription drug 313 benefit. Such form must be no longer than may not exceed two 314 pages in length, excluding any instructions or guiding 315 documentation, and must include all clinical documentation 316 necessary for the utilization review entity health insurer to 317 make a decision. At a minimum, the form must include: (1) 318 sufficient patient information to identify the member, date of 319 birth, full name, and Health Plan ID number; (2) provider name, 320 address and phone number; (3) the medical procedure, course of 321 treatment, or prescription drug benefit being requested, 322 including the medical reason therefor, and all services tried 323 and failed; (4) any laboratory documentation required; and (5) 324 an attestation that all information provided is true and 325 accurate. 326 (3)âThe Financial Services Commission, in consultation with 327 the Agency for Health Care Administration, shall adopt by rule 328 guidelines for all prior authorization forms which ensure the 329 general uniformity of such forms. 330 (4)âA utilization review entity shall establish and offer a 331 secure, interactive online electronic prior authorization 332 process to accept electronic prior authorization requests. The 333 electronic prior authorization process must allow a person 334 seeking a prior authorization the ability to upload 335 documentation if such documentation is required by the 336 utilization review entity to adjudicate the prior authorization 337 request. Once a provider grants a health insurer access to a 338 patientâs electronic medical record, the provider is deemed to 339 have supplied all information necessary for prior authorization 340 of the health care service, including, without limitation, all 341 information that is reasonably required by the health insurer, 342 other than for an emergency health care service or for a service 343 provided to a patient who is experiencing an emergency medical 344 condition, in advance of the provision of service, and the 345 health insurer asserts is missing as of the date of such 346 service. Additional information or documentation, regardless of 347 whether the utilization review entity requests any additional 348 information, is deemed unnecessary, and deemed not required, for 349 prior authorization of the health care service, and any request 350 for additional information or any position of the utilization 351 review entity or any third party acting on behalf of the 352 utilization review entity regarding any lack of information from 353 the provider is prohibited from being used to deny, pend, or 354 delay prior authorization of the health care service. 355 (5)(4)âElectronic prior authorization approvals do not 356 preclude benefit verification or medical review by the health 357 insurer under either the medical or pharmacy benefits. 358 (6)âA utilization review entityâs prior authorization 359 process is prohibited from requiring information that is not 360 needed to make a determination or facilitate a determination of 361 medical necessity of the requested medical procedure, course of 362 treatment, or prescription drug benefit. 363 (7)âA utilization review entity shall disclose all of its 364 prior authorization requirements and restrictions, including any 365 written clinical criteria, in a publicly accessible manner on 366 its website. These requirements and restrictions must be 367 explained in detail and in clear and ordinary terms. 368 (8)âA utilization review entity is prohibited from 369 implementing any new requirements or restrictions and from 370 making changes to existing requirements or restrictions on 371 obtaining prior authorization unless: 372 (a)âThe changes have been available on a publicly 373 accessible website for at least 60 days before they are 374 implemented; 375 (b)âPolicyholders and health care providers affected by the 376 new requirements and restrictions or changes to the requirements 377 and restrictions are provided with a written notice of the 378 changes at least 60 days before they are implemented, with such 379 notice being delivered electronically or by other means as 380 agreed to by the policyholder or the health care provider; and 381 (c)âAll applicable amendments to a providerâs agreement 382 with the applicable health insurer or utilization review entity 383 have been obtained and memorialized in a mutually agreed-upon 384 writing before such implementation. 385 (9)(a)âUtilization review entities shall, by March 31 of 386 each year, submit a report to the Office of Insurance Regulation 387 with the following data elements for the prior calendar year: 388 1.âA list of all items and services requiring prior 389 authorization. 390 2.âThe percentage of standard prior authorization requests 391 approved by the utilization review entity, aggregated by item or 392 service. 393 3.âThe percentage of standard prior authorization requests 394 denied by the utilization review entity, aggregated by item or 395 service. 396 4.âThe percentage of standard prior authorization requests 397 approved by the utilization review entity after appeal, 398 aggregated by item or service. 399 5.âThe percentage of prior authorizations when the 400 timeframe for review was extended and request approved, by item 401 or service. 402 6.âThe percentage of expedited prior authorization requests 403 approved by the utilization review entity, by item or service. 404 7.âThe percentage of expedited prior authorization requests 405 denied by the utilization review entity, by item or service. 406 8.âThe percentage of expedited prior authorization requests 407 approved by the utilization review entity after appeal, by item 408 or service. 409 9.âThe average and median time between submission of a 410 request for prior authorization and the utilization review 411 entityâs decision for standard prior authorizations, by item or 412 service. 413 10.âThe average and median time between submission of a 414 request for prior authorization and the utilization review 415 entityâs decision for expedited prior authorizations, by item or 416 service. 417 (b)âThe Office of Insurance Regulation shall, by July 1 of 418 each year, publish a report on its website detailing the 419 information in paragraph (a) submitted by utilization review 420 entities. 421 (10)âUtilization review entities shall ensure that all 422 adverse determinations are made by a physician licensed under 423 chapter 458 or chapter 459. The physician: 424 (a)âMust possess a current and valid nonrestricted license 425 to practice medicine in this state; 426 (b)âMust be of the same specialty as the physician who 427 typically manages the medical condition or disease or provides 428 the health care service involved in the request; 429 (c)âMust have at least 5 years of experience treating 430 patients with the medical condition or disease for which the 431 health care service is being requested; and 432 (d)âMay not have any direct or indirect financial 433 arrangement with the utilization review entity that rewards or 434 incentivizes, financially or otherwise, such physician in any 435 way relating to adverse determinations. 436 (11)âNotice of an adverse determination must be provided by 437 e-mail to the health care provider that initiated the prior 438 authorization and to the patient. Notice required under this 439 subsection must include: 440 (a)âThe name, title, e-mail address, and telephone number 441 of the physician responsible for making the adverse 442 determination. 443 (b)âAny written clinical criteria and any internal rule, 444 guideline, or protocol on which the utilization review entity 445 relied when making the adverse determination and the reasons 446 those provisions apply to the patientâs specific medical 447 circumstance. 448 (c)âInformation for the patient and the patientâs health 449 care provider which describes the procedure through which the 450 patient or health care provider may request a copy of any report 451 developed by personnel performing the review that led to the 452 adverse determination. 453 (d)âInformation that explains to the patient and the 454 patientâs health care provider the manner in which to appeal the 455 adverse determination. 456 (12)âIf a utilization review entity requires prior 457 authorization of a nonurgent health care service, the 458 utilization review entity must grant a prior authorization or 459 make an adverse determination and notify the patient and the 460 patientâs health care provider of the decision within 72 hours 461 after obtaining all necessary information to grant the prior 462 authorization or make the adverse determination. For purposes of 463 this subsection, the term ânecessary informationâ includes the 464 results of any face-to-face clinical evaluation or second 465 opinion that may be required. 466 (13)âA utilization review entity shall grant an expedited 467 prior authorization or make an expedited adverse determination 468 concerning an urgent health care service and notify the patient 469 and the patientâs health care provider of such expedited prior 470 authorization or adverse determination no later than 24 hours 471 after receiving all information needed to complete the review of 472 the requested urgent health care service. 473 (14)(a)âA utilization review entity is prohibited from 474 requiring prior authorization for: 475 1.âPrehospital transportation; 476 2.âProvision of an emergency health care service; or 477 3.âProvision of a service to a patient who is experiencing 478 an emergency medical condition. 479 (b)âA utilization review entity is prohibited from 480 conducting utilization review activity, and from making any 481 adverse determinations, to the extent restricted or prohibited 482 by an agreement with a health care provider. A utilization 483 review entity is prohibited from performing any utilization 484 review activity, and from making any adverse determinations, 485 with respect to: 486 1.âAn emergency health care service; or 487 2.âA service provided to a patient who experiences an 488 emergency medical condition. 489 (15)âA utilization review entity is prohibited from 490 requiring prior authorization, and from making any adverse 491 determinations, for the provision of medications for opioid use 492 disorder. For purposes of this subsection, the term âmedications 493 for opioid use disorderâ means the use of medications, commonly 494 prescribed in combination with counseling and behavioral 495 therapies, to provide a comprehensive approach to the treatment 496 of opioid use disorder. FDA-approved medications used to treat 497 opioid addiction include, but are not limited to, methadone, 498 buprenorphine, alone or in combination with naloxone, and 499 extended-release injectable naltrexone. Types of behavioral 500 therapies include, but are not limited to, individual therapy, 501 group counseling, family behavior therapy, motivational 502 incentives, and other modalities. 503 (16)âA utilization review entity is prohibited from 504 revoking, limiting, conditioning, or restricting a prior 505 authorization if care is provided within 45 business days after 506 the date the health care provider receives the prior 507 authorization. A utilization review entity must pay, or cause 508 payment to be made to, the health care provider, without any 509 prepayment review or prepayment audit before such payment, at 510 the contracted payment rate for a health care service provided 511 by the health care provider per the prior authorization, unless: 512 (a)âThe health care provider knowingly and materially 513 misrepresented the health care service in the prior 514 authorization request with the specific intent to deceive and 515 obtain an unlawful payment from the utilization review entity; 516 (b)âThe health care service was no longer a covered 517 benefit, and medical necessity did not constitute a basis for 518 such noncovered benefit status, on the day the health care 519 service was provided, and the utilization review entity notified 520 the health care provider in writing of these facts before the 521 health care service was provided; 522 (c)âThe authorized service was never performed; or 523 (d)âThe patient was no longer enrolled under the applicable 524 health plan and, on that basis, was not eligible for health care 525 coverage from the applicable health insurer or self-insured plan 526 on the day the care was provided, and the utilization review 527 entity notified the health care provider in writing of these 528 facts before the health care service was provided. 529 (17)âIf a utilization review entity requires a prior 530 authorization for a health care service for the treatment of a 531 chronic or long-term care condition, the prior authorization 532 must remain valid for the length of the treatment, and the 533 utilization review entity is prohibited from requiring the 534 patient to obtain a prior authorization again for the health 535 care service. 536 (18)âA utilization review entity is prohibited from 537 imposing an additional prior authorization requirement with 538 respect to a surgical or otherwise invasive procedure, or any 539 item furnished as part of the surgical or invasive procedure, if 540 the procedure or item is furnished during the perioperative 541 period of another procedure for which prior authorization was 542 granted by the health insurer. 543 (19)âIf there is a change in coverage or approval criteria 544 for a previously authorized health care service, the change in 545 coverage or approval criteria is prohibited from adversely 546 affecting an enrollee who received prior authorization before 547 the effective date of the change for the remainder of the 548 enrolleeâs plan year. 549 (20)âA utilization review entity shall continue to honor a 550 prior authorization it has granted to an enrollee when the 551 enrollee changes products under the same health insurer. 552 (21)âAny failure by a utilization review entity to comply 553 with the deadlines and other requirements specified in this 554 section will result in any health care services subject to 555 review being automatically deemed authorized by the utilization 556 review entity. 557 (22)âExcept as otherwise provided in paragraphs (16)(a) 558 (d), prior authorization constitutes a conclusive determination 559 of the medical necessity of the authorized health care service 560 and an irrevocable obligation to pay for such authorized health 561 care service. 562 (23)(a)âThis section prohibits an agreement with a health 563 care provider to restrict, limit, prohibit, or substitute a 564 utilization review activity or prior authorization. 565 (b)âNothing in this section may be construed to: 566 1.âLimit in any way the restrictions or prohibitions on 567 adverse determinations under an agreement with a health care 568 provider, nor to imply permission for, or applicability of, 569 adverse determinations for emergency health care services. 570 2.âRestrict, limit, or prohibit in any way prior 571 authorizations under an agreement between a provider and a 572 utilization review entity, nor to restrict, limit, or prohibit a 573 providerâs rights to contest, reject, or oppose any prior 574 authorization activities. 575 (24)âFor a violation of this section, a provider shall have 576 a private cause of action to proceed against the health insurer 577 or utilization review entity in the applicable tribunal for the 578 violation. 579 Section 3.âSection 627.6131, Florida Statutes, is amended 580 to read: 581 627.6131âPrompt payment of claims.â 582 (1)âThe contract must shall include the following 583 provision: âTime of Payment of Claims: After receiving written 584 proof of loss, the health insurer shall will pay monthly all 585 claims. Claims benefits then due for ...(type of benefit).... 586 Benefits for any other loss covered by this policy shall will be 587 paid as soon as the health insurer receives proper written 588 proof.â 589 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 590 (a)ââClaimâ for a noninstitutional provider means a paper 591 HCFA 1500 claim form, or its successor, or an electronic billing 592 instrument submitted to the health insurerâs designated location 593 that consists of the ANSI ASC X12N 837P standard HCFA 1500 data 594 set, or its successor, that has all mandatory entries for a 595 physician licensed under chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, 596 chapter 461, or chapter 463, or psychologists licensed under 597 chapter 490 or any appropriate billing instrument as designated 598 by the provider that has all mandatory entries for any other 599 noninstitutional provider. For institutional providers, âclaimâ 600 means a paper CMS-1450 claim form, or its successor, or an 601 electronic billing instrument submitted to the health insurerâs 602 designated location that consists of the ANSI ASC X12N 837I 603 standard UB-92 data set, or its successor, with entries stated 604 as mandatory by the National Uniform Billing Committee. 605 (b)ââClean claimâ means a completed form, or completed 606 electronic billing instrument, containing all information 607 required under the applicable form or electronic billing 608 instrument, as well as information reasonably required by the 609 health insurer, other than for emergency services and care as 610 defined in s. 395.002, in advance of the provision of service by 611 the health insurer to substantiate the claim. 612 (c)ââElectronic medical recordâ means the digital record of 613 a patientâs information that may be accessed through electronic 614 means, via portal or other method of electronic access, which 615 may include information regarding the patientâs medical history, 616 medical condition, medical treatment, laboratory results, 617 diagnostic reports, and clinical notes. 618 (d)ââEmergency health care servicesâ has the same meaning 619 as âemergency services and careâ as defined in s. 395.002. 620 (e)ââHealth insurerâ means any entity that offers health 621 insurance coverage, whether through a fully insured plan or a 622 self-insured plan or fund, including, as applicable: 623 1.âAn authorized health insurer offering health insurance 624 as defined in s. 624.603, as well as any entity that offers a 625 commercial self-insurance fund as defined in s. 624.462(2) or a 626 group self-insurance fund as described in s. 624.4621. 627 2.âA health insurer that is subject to any provision of 628 this chapter, as well as any entity that offers a self-insurance 629 plan or a group self-insurance plan. 630 (f)ââInsured ineligibilityâ means that the insured was no 631 longer enrolled in the health plan at the time of receiving the 632 applicable service. 633 (g)ââOverpaymentâ means payment made upon a claim that is: 634 1.âBilled in error; 635 2.âA duplicate claim; or 636 3.âBilled for a service rendered to a patient despite 637 insured ineligibility. 638 639 A request for overpayment is limited to a billing error, 640 duplicate bill, or insured ineligibility. 641 (3)âAll claims for payment or overpayment, whether 642 electronic or nonelectronic: 643 (a)âAre considered received on the date the claim is 644 received by the health insurer at its designated claims-receipt 645 location or the date the claim for overpayment claim is received 646 by the provider at its designated location. 647 (b)âAs to providersâ claims for payment, must be mailed or 648 electronically transferred to the primary health insurer within 649 6 months after the following have occurred: 650 1.âDischarge for inpatient services or the date of service 651 for outpatient services; and 652 2.âThe provider has been furnished with the correct name 653 and address of the patientâs health insurer. 654 655 All providersâ claims for payment, whether electronic or 656 nonelectronic, must be mailed or electronically transferred to 657 the secondary health insurer within 45 90 days after final 658 determination by the primary health insurer. A providerâs claim 659 is considered submitted on the date it is electronically 660 transferred or mailed. 661 (c)âMust not duplicate a claim previously submitted unless 662 it is determined that the original claim was not received or is 663 otherwise lost. 664 (4)âFor all electronically submitted claims, a health 665 insurer shall: 666 (a)âWithin 24 hours after the beginning of the next 667 business day after receipt of the claim, provide to the 668 electronic source submitting the claim an electronic 669 acknowledgment of the receipt of the claim, accompanied by a 670 statement indicating the health insurerâs position as to whether 671 the claim is a clean claim or is missing any information that is 672 required under the applicable electronic billing instrument, as 673 described in paragraph (2)(a), or that was reasonably required 674 by the health insurer, other than for emergency health care 675 services, in advance of the provision of service to substantiate 676 to the electronic source submitting the claim, and the health 677 insurer asserts is missing as of the date of service. 678 (b)âWithin 15 20 days after receipt of the claim, pay the 679 claim or notify a provider or designee if a claim is denied or 680 contested. Notice of the healthÂ­ insurerâs action on the claim 681 and payment of the claim is considered to be made on the date 682 the notice or payment was received by the provider mailed or 683 electronically transferred. 684 (c)1.âNotification of the health insurerâs determination of 685 a contested claim must be accompanied by an itemized list of any 686 additional information that is required under the applicable 687 billing instrument, as described in paragraph (2)(a), or that 688 was reasonably required by the health insurer, other than for 689 emergency health care services, in advance of the provision of 690 service to substantiate the claim, and the health insurer 691 asserts is missing as of the date of such service or documents 692 the insurer can reasonably determine are necessary to process 693 the claim. 694 2.âA provider must submit the additional information or 695 documentation, as specified on the itemized list, within 30 35 696 days after receipt of the notification of contestation unless, 697 within the 30-day period, the provider notifies the health 698 insurer of the providerâs position that a clean claim has been 699 submitted. Additional information is considered submitted on the 700 date it is electronically transferred or mailed. The health 701 insurer is prohibited from requesting may not request duplicate 702 documents. 703 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, electronic means of 704 transmission of claims, notices, documents, forms, and payments 705 shall be used to the greatest extent possible by the health 706 insurer and the provider. 707 (e)âA claim contested by the health insurer must be paid or 708 denied within 30 90 days after receipt of the additional 709 information requested claim. Failure to pay or deny a claim 710 within 90 120 days after receipt of the claim, regardless of 711 whether contested by the health insurer, creates an 712 uncontestable obligation to pay the claim as submitted by the 713 provider. 714 (5)âFor all nonelectronically submitted claims, a health 715 insurer shall: 716 (a)âWithin 15 days following receipt of the claim Effective 717 November 1, 2003, provide to the provider or its designee: 718 1.âAn acknowledgment of receipt of the claim, accompanied 719 by a statement indicating the health insurerâs position as to 720 whether the claim is a clean claim or the claim is missing any 721 information that is required under the applicable paper billing 722 form, as described in paragraph (2)(a), or that was reasonably 723 required by the health insurer, other than for emergency health 724 care services, in advance of the provision of service to 725 substantiate the claim, and the health insurer asserts is 726 missing as of the date of service; or 727 2.âwithin 15 days after receipt of the claim to the 728 provider or provide a provider within 15 days after receipt with 729 Electronic access to the status of the a submitted claim, which 730 status must indicate the health insurerâs position as to whether 731 the claim is a clean claim or missing any information described 732 in subparagraph 1. 733 (b)âWithin 30 40 days after receipt of the claim, pay the 734 claim or notify a provider or designee if a claim is denied or 735 contested. Notice of the health insurerâs action on the claim 736 and payment of the claim is considered to be made on the date 737 the notice or payment was received by the provider mailed or 738 electronically transferred. 739 (c)1.âNotification of the health insurerâs determination of 740 a contested claim must be accompanied by an itemized list of any 741 additional information that is required under the applicable 742 form or billing instrument, as described in paragraph (2)(a), or 743 that was reasonably required by the health insurer, other than 744 for emergency health care services, in advance of the provision 745 of service to substantiate the claim, and the health insurer 746 asserts is missing as of the date of such service or documents 747 the insurer can reasonably determine are necessary to process 748 the claim. 749 2.âA provider must submit the additional information or 750 documentation, as specified on the itemized list, within 30 35 751 days after receipt of the notification of contestation unless, 752 within the 30-day period, the provider notifies the health 753 insurer of its position that a clean claim has been submitted. 754 Additional information is considered submitted on the date it is 755 electronically transferred or mailed. The health insurer is 756 prohibited from requesting may not request duplicate documents. 757 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, electronic means of 758 transmission of claims, notices, documents, forms, and payments 759 must shall be used to the greatest extent possible by the health 760 insurer and the provider. 761 (e)âA claim contested by the health insurer must be paid or 762 denied within 30 120 days after receipt of the additional 763 information requested claim. Failure to pay or deny a claim 764 within 90 140 days after receipt of the claim, regardless of 765 whether contested by the health insurer, creates an 766 uncontestable obligation to pay the claim as submitted by the 767 provider. 768 (6)âRegardless of whether a claim has been submitted 769 electronically or nonelectronically, and notwithstanding any 770 other provision of this section: 771 (a)âOnce a provider grants a health insurer access to a 772 patientâs electronic medical record, the provider is deemed to 773 have supplied all information necessary to pay the claim, 774 including, without limitation, all information that is required 775 under the applicable billing instrument and that was reasonably 776 required by the health insurer, other than for emergency health 777 care services, in advance of the provision of service to 778 substantiate the claim. Additional information or documentation, 779 regardless of whether the health insurer requests any additional 780 information, is deemed unnecessary, and deemed not required for 781 payment of the claim, and any request for additional 782 information, and any position of the health insurer or any third 783 party acting on behalf of the health insurer regarding any lack 784 of information from the provider, is prohibited from being used 785 to deny, reduce, offset, withhold, pend, or delay payment of the 786 claim. 787 (b)âIf notice of access to the electronic medical record 788 has been provided to the health insurer, the claim must be paid 789 or denied within 30 days of such notice to the health insurer. 790 Failure to pay or deny a claim for which the health insurer has 791 been provided notice of access to the electronic medical record 792 within 75 days after receipt of such notice creates an 793 uncontestable obligation to pay the claim as submitted by the 794 provider. 795 (7)(6)âIf a health insurer determines that it has made an 796 overpayment to a provider for services rendered to an insured, 797 the health insurer must make an overpayment a claim for such 798 overpayment to the providerâs designated location. A health 799 insurer that makes an overpayment a claim for overpayment to a 800 provider under this section shall give the provider a written or 801 electronic statement specifying the basis for the retrospective 802 retroactive denial or payment adjustment. The health insurer 803 must also identify the claim or claims, or portion thereof, as 804 to which the health insurer alleges overpayment claim, and the 805 specific invoice number submitted with or on the claim portion 806 thereof, for which a claim for overpayment is submitted. Except 807 as provided in subparagraph (a)3., there may be no denial, 808 reduction, offset, withholding, pending, or delay of payment, or 809 other negative impact, regardless of whether by the health 810 insurer or any third party acting on behalf of such health 811 insurer, on payment of any other claim of the provider on the 812 basis of the overpayment allegation. 813 (a)âIf an overpayment determination is the result of 814 retrospective retroactive review or retrospective audit of 815 coverage decisions or payment levels not related to fraud, a 816 health insurer must shall adhere to the following procedures: 817 1.âAll overpayment claims for overpayment must be received 818 by the submitted to a provider within 18 30 months after the 819 health insurerâs payment of the claim. A provider must pay, 820 deny, or contest the health insurerâs claim for overpayment 821 claim within 40 days after the receipt of the overpayment claim. 822 All contested overpayment claims for overpayment must be paid or 823 denied within 120 days after receipt of the overpayment claim. 824 Failure to pay or deny an overpayment and claim within 140 days 825 after receipt creates an uncontestable obligation to pay the 826 overpayment claim. 827 2.âA provider that denies or contests a health insurerâs 828 overpayment claim for overpayment or any portion of an 829 overpayment a claim shall notify the health insurer, in writing, 830 within 40 35 days after the provider receives the overpayment 831 claim that such overpayment the claim for overpayment is 832 contested or denied. The notice that the overpayment claim for 833 overpayment is denied or contested must identify the denied or 834 contested portion of the overpayment claim and the specific 835 reason for contesting or denying the overpayment claim and, if 836 contested, must include a request for additional information. If 837 the health insurer submits additional information, the health 838 insurer must, within 35 days after receipt of the request, mail 839 or electronically transfer the information to the provider. The 840 provider shall pay or deny the overpayment claim for overpayment 841 within 45 days after receipt of the information. The notice from 842 the provider regarding denial or contestation of the overpayment 843 claim is considered made on the date the notice is mailed or 844 electronically transferred by the provider. 845 3.âThe health insurer is prohibited from denying, reducing, 846 offsetting, withholding, pending, or delaying may not reduce 847 payment to the provider for other services unless the provider 848 agrees to the denial, reduction, offset, withholding, pending, 849 or delay of payment in writing or fails to respond to the health 850 insurerâs overpayment claim as required by this paragraph. 851 4.âPayment of an overpayment claim is considered made on 852 the date the payment was mailed or electronically transferred. 853 An overdue payment of a claim bears simple interest at the rate 854 of 12 percent per year. Interest on an overdue payment for an 855 overpayment a claim for an overpayment begins to accrue when the 856 overpayment claim should have been paid, denied, or contested. 857 (b)âAn overpayment A claim is prohibited for overpayment 858 shall not be permitted beyond 18 30 months after the health 859 insurerâs payment of a claim, except that overpayment claims for 860 overpayment may be sought beyond that time from providers 861 convicted of fraud pursuant to s. 817.234. 862 (8)(7)âPayment of a claim is considered made on the date 863 the payment was mailed or electronically transferred. An overdue 864 payment of a claim bears simple interest of 15 12 percent per 865 year, to be calculated on the full total amount that should have 866 been paid on the claim within the applicable time period 867 specified in this section. If an applicable court, arbitration 868 tribunal, or other binding legal process determines that a claim 869 that was paid at a lesser amount should have been paid at a full 870 total amount, whether under a breach of contract legal claim, a 871 legal claim under a statutory private cause of action, or other 872 basis, the 15 percent per year interest must be calculated on 873 the full total amount, rather than upon the difference between 874 the full total amount and the amount that was actually paid. If 875 an applicable court, arbitration tribunal, or other binding 876 legal process determines that a claim was subject to an 877 inappropriate or impermissible denial or partial denial, whether 878 in a breach of contract, statute, common law, or otherwise, 879 interest must be calculated on the full total amount that should 880 have been paid on the claim within the applicable time period 881 for payment specified in this section, and the act of denial or 882 partial denial is deemed not to have in any way tolled the time 883 period for such payment. Interest on the full total amount that 884 should have been paid on the claim within the applicable time 885 period specified in this section an overdue payment for a claim 886 or for any portion of a claim begins to accrue when the claim 887 should have been paid, denied, or contested. The interest must 888 be paid along with, and in addition to, the payment for the 889 satisfaction of the full total amount of the claim, as 890 determined by an applicable court, arbitration tribunal, or 891 other binding legal process is payable with the payment of the 892 claim. 893 (9)(8)âFor all contracts entered into or renewed on or 894 after October 1, 2002, a health insurerâs internal dispute 895 resolution process related to a denied claim not under active 896 review by a mediator, arbitrator, or third-party dispute entity 897 must be finalized within 60 days after the receipt of the 898 providerâs request for review or appeal. Notwithstanding any 899 provision of this section, when the provider and health insurer 900 disagree as to interpretation of contractual or statutory 901 language, the provider is not required to participate in the 902 health insurerâs internal dispute resolution process. 903 (10)(9)âA provider or any representative of a provider, 904 regardless of whether the provider is under contract with the 905 health insurer, is prohibited from collecting or attempting may 906 not collect or attempt to collect money from, maintaining 907 maintain any action at law against, or reporting report to a 908 credit agency an insured for payment of covered services for 909 which the health insurer contested or denied the providerâs 910 claim. This prohibition applies during the pendency of any claim 911 for payment made by the provider to the health insurer for 912 payment of the services or internal dispute resolution process 913 to determine whether the health insurer is liable for the 914 services. For a claim, this pendency applies from the date the 915 claim or a portion of the claim is denied to the date of the 916 completion of the health insurerâs internal dispute resolution 917 process, not to exceed 60 days. This subsection does not 918 prohibit the collection by the provider of copayments, 919 coinsurance, or deductible amounts due the provider. 920 (10)âThe provisions of this section may not be waived, 921 voided, or nullified by contract. 922 (11)âA health insurer is prohibited from retrospectively 923 denying may not retroactively deny a claim because of insured 924 ineligibility more than 90 days 1 year after the date of payment 925 of the claim. 926 (12)âA health insurer must shall pay a contracted primary 927 care or admitting physician, pursuant to such physicianâs 928 contract, for providing inpatient services in a contracted 929 hospital to an insured if such services are determined by such 930 physician the health insurer to be medically necessary and, 931 regardless of the health planâs determination of medical 932 necessity, are otherwise covered services under the health 933 insurerâs contract with the contract holder. 934 (13)âUpon written notification by an insured, a health an 935 insurer shall investigate any claim of improper billing of the 936 insured by a physician, hospital, or other health care provider 937 for a health care service alleged to not actually have been 938 received. The health insurer shall determine whether if the 939 insured actually received the applicable service was properly 940 billed for only those procedures and services that the insured 941 actually received. If the health insurer determines that the 942 insured did not actually receive the applicable service has been 943 improperly billed, the health insurer must shall notify the 944 insured and the provider of its findings and must shall reduce 945 the amount of payment to the provider by the amount for the 946 service that was not actually received determined to be 947 improperly billed. If a reduction is made due to such 948 notification by the insured, the insurer shall pay to the 949 insured 20 percent of the amount of the reduction up to $500. 950 (14)âA permissible error ratio of 5 percent is established 951 for health insurerâs claims payment violations of paragraphs 952 (4)(a), (b), (c), and (e) and (5)(a), (b), (c), and (e). If the 953 error ratio of a particular health insurer does not exceed the 954 permissible error ratio of 5 percent for an audit period, no 955 fine may shall be assessed for the noted claims violations for 956 the audit period. The error ratio is shall be determined by 957 dividing the number of claims with violations found on a 958 statistically valid sample of claims for the audit period by the 959 total number of claims in the sample. If the error ratio exceeds 960 the permissible error ratio of 5 percent, a fine may be assessed 961 according to s. 624.4211 for those claims payment violations 962 which exceed the error ratio. Notwithstanding the provisions of 963 this section, the office may fine a health insurer for claims 964 payment violations of paragraphs (4)(e) and (5)(e) which create 965 an uncontestable obligation to pay the claim as submitted by the 966 provider. The office shall refrain from imposing a not fine upon 967 a health insurer insurers for violations which the office 968 determines were due to circumstances beyond the health insurerâs 969 control. 970 (15)âThis section is applicable only to a major medical 971 expense health insurance policy as defined in s. 627.643(2)(e) 972 offered by a group or an individual health insurer licensed 973 under pursuant to chapter 624, including a preferred provider 974 policy under s. 627.6471 and an exclusive provider organization 975 under s. 627.6472 or a group or individual insurance contract 976 that only provides direct payments to dentists for enumerated 977 dental services, or other health insurance coverage, policy, or 978 fund, regardless of whether fully insured or self-insured, 979 offered or administered by a health insurer. 980 (16)âNotwithstanding paragraph (4)(b), where an electronic 981 pharmacy claim is submitted to a pharmacy benefits manager 982 acting on behalf of a health insurer, the pharmacy benefits 983 manager shall, within 30 days of receipt of the claim, pay the 984 claim or notify a provider or designee if a claim is denied or 985 contested. Notice of the health insurerâs action on the claim 986 and payment of the claim is considered to be made on the date 987 the notice or payment was received by the provider mailed or 988 electronically transferred. 989 (17)âNotwithstanding paragraph (5)(a), effective November 990 1, 2003, where a nonelectronic pharmacy claim is submitted to a 991 pharmacy benefits manager acting on behalf of a health insurer, 992 the pharmacy benefits manager shall provide acknowledgment of 993 receipt of the claim within 30 days after receipt of the claim 994 to the provider or provide a provider within 30 days after 995 receipt with electronic access to the status of a submitted 996 claim. 997 (18)âNotwithstanding the 18-month 30-month period provided 998 in subsection (7) (6), all overpayment claims for overpayment 999 submitted to a provider licensed under chapter 395, chapter 458, 1000 chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, chapter 463, chapter 466, 1001 or chapter 490 must be submitted to the provider within 12 1002 months after the health insurerâs payment of the claim. An 1003 overpayment A claim to a provider licensed under chapter 395, 1004 chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, chapter 463, 1005 chapter 466, or chapter 490 is prohibited for overpayment may 1006 not be permitted beyond 12 months after the health insurerâs 1007 payment of a claim, except that overpayment claims for 1008 overpayment may be sought beyond that time from providers 1009 convicted of fraud pursuant to s. 817.234. 1010 (19)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, 1011 all claims for underpayment from a provider licensed under 1012 chapter 395, chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, 1013 or chapter 466 must be submitted to the health insurer within 12 1014 months after the health insurerâs payment of the claim. A claim 1015 for underpayment by a provider licensed under chapter 395, 1016 chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, or chapter 1017 466 is prohibited may not be permitted beyond 12 months after 1018 the health insurerâs payment of a claim. 1019 (20)âNothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit, 1020 restrict, or negatively impact any legal claim by a provider or 1021 health insurer for breach of contract, statutory or regulatory 1022 violation, or a common-law cause of action, nor to shorten or 1023 otherwise negatively impact the statute of limitations timeframe 1024 for bringing any such legal claim. 1025 (21)âA health insurer is prohibited from requesting 1026 information from a contracted or noncontracted provider which 1027 does not apply to the medical condition at issue for the 1028 purposes of adjudicating a clean claim. 1029 (22)âA health insurer is prohibited from requesting a 1030 contracted or noncontracted provider to resubmit claim 1031 information that the contracted or noncontracted provider can 1032 document it has already provided to the health insurer or that 1033 is contained inside the electronic medical record to which the 1034 health insurer has been provided access. 1035 (23)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, a 1036 health insurer is prohibited from requiring any information from 1037 a provider before the provision of emergency health care 1038 services as a condition of payment of a claim, as a basis for 1039 denying, delaying, offsetting, withholding, or reducing payment 1040 of a claim, or in contesting whether the claim is a clean claim. 1041 (24)âFor a violation of this section, a provider shall have 1042 a private cause of action to proceed against the health insurer 1043 in the applicable tribunal for the violation. 1044 (25)(20)(a)âA contract between a health insurer and a 1045 dentist licensed under chapter 466 for the provision of services 1046 to an insured is prohibited from specifying may not specify 1047 credit card payment as the only acceptable method for payments 1048 from the health insurer to the dentist. 1049 (b)âWhen a health insurer employs the method of claims 1050 payment to a dentist through electronic funds transfer, 1051 including, but not limited to, virtual credit card payment, the 1052 health insurer shall notify the dentist as provided in this 1053 paragraph and obtain the dentistâs consent before employing the 1054 electronic funds transfer. The dentistâs consent described in 1055 this paragraph applies to the dentistâs entire practice. For the 1056 purpose of this paragraph, the dentistâs consent, which may be 1057 given through e-mail, must bear the signature of the dentist. 1058 Such signature includes an electronic or digital signature if 1059 the form of signature is recognized as a valid signature under 1060 applicable federal law or state contract law or an act that 1061 demonstrates express consent, including, but not limited to, 1062 checking a box indicating consent. The health insurer or dentist 1063 is prohibited from requiring may not require that a dentistâs 1064 consent as described in this paragraph be made on a patient-by 1065 patient basis. The notification provided by the health insurer 1066 to the dentist must include all of the following: 1067 1.âThe fees, if any, associated with the electronic funds 1068 transfer. 1069 2.âThe available methods of payment of claims by the health 1070 insurer, with clear instructions to the dentist on how to select 1071 an alternative payment method. 1072 (c)âA health insurer that pays a claim to a dentist through 1073 automated clearinghouse transfer is prohibited from charging may 1074 not charge a fee solely to transmit the payment to the dentist 1075 unless the dentist has consented to the fee. 1076 (d)âThis subsection applies to contracts delivered, issued, 1077 or renewed on or after January 1, 2025. 1078 (e)âThe office has all rights and powers to enforce this 1079 subsection as provided by s. 624.307. 1080 (f)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 1081 subsection. 1082 (26)(21)(a)âA health insurer is prohibited from denying may 1083 not deny any claim subsequently submitted by a dentist licensed 1084 under chapter 466 for procedures specifically included in a 1085 prior authorization unless at least one of the following 1086 circumstances applies for each procedure denied: 1087 1.âBenefit limitations, such as annual maximums and 1088 frequency limitations not applicable at the time of the prior 1089 authorization, are reached subsequent to issuance of the prior 1090 authorization. 1091 2.âThe documentation provided by the person submitting the 1092 claim fails to support the claim as originally authorized. 1093 3.âSubsequent to the issuance of the prior authorization, 1094 new procedures are provided to the patient or a change in the 1095 condition of the patient occurs such that the prior authorized 1096 procedure would no longer be considered medically necessary, 1097 based on the prevailing standard of care. 1098 4.âSubsequent to the issuance of the prior authorization, 1099 new procedures are provided to the patient or a change in the 1100 patientâs condition occurs such that the prior authorized 1101 procedure would at that time have required disapproval pursuant 1102 to the terms and conditions for coverage under the patientâs 1103 plan in effect at the time the prior authorization was issued. 1104 5.âThe denial of the claim was due to one of the following: 1105 a.âAnother payor is responsible for payment. 1106 b.âThe dentist has already been paid for the procedures 1107 identified in the claim. 1108 c.âThe claim was submitted fraudulently, or the prior 1109 authorization was based in whole or material part on erroneous 1110 information provided to the health insurer by the dentist, 1111 patient, or other person not related to the health insurer. 1112 d.âThe person receiving the procedure was not eligible to 1113 receive the procedure on the date of service. 1114 e.âThe services were provided during the grace period 1115 established under s. 627.608 or applicable federal regulations, 1116 and the dental insurer notified the provider that the patient 1117 was in the grace period when the provider requested eligibility 1118 or enrollment verification from the dental insurer, if such 1119 request was made. 1120 (b)âThis subsection applies to all contracts delivered, 1121 issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025. 1122 (c)âThe office has all rights and powers to enforce this 1123 subsection as provided by s. 624.307. 1124 (d)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 1125 subsection. 1126 Section 4.âSection 641.3155, Florida Statutes, is amended 1127 to read: 1128 641.3155âPrompt payment of claims.â 1129 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 1130 (a)ââClaimâ for a noninstitutional provider means a paper 1131 HCFA 1500 claim form, or its successor, or an electronic billing 1132 instrument submitted to the health maintenance organizationâs 1133 designated location that consists of the ANSI ASC X12N 837P 1134 standard HCFA 1500 data set, or its successor, that has all 1135 mandatory entries for a physician licensed under chapter 458, 1136 chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, or chapter 463, or 1137 psychologists licensed under chapter 490 or any appropriate 1138 billing instrument as designated by the provider that has all 1139 mandatory entries for any other noninstitutional provider. For 1140 institutional providers, âclaimâ means a paper CMS-1450 claim 1141 form, or its successor, or an electronic billing instrument 1142 submitted to the health maintenance organizationâs designated 1143 location that consists of the ANSI ASC X12N 837I standard UB-92 1144 data set or its successor with entries stated as mandatory by 1145 the National Uniform Billing Committee. 1146 (b)ââClean claimâ means a completed form, or completed 1147 electronic billing instrument, containing all information 1148 required under the applicable form or electronic billing 1149 instrument, as well as information reasonably required by the 1150 health maintenance organization, other than for emergency 1151 services and care as defined in s. 641.19, in advance of the 1152 provision of service by the health maintenance organization to 1153 substantiate the claim. 1154 (c)ââElectronic medical recordâ means the digital record of 1155 a patientâs information that may be accessed through electronic 1156 means, via portal or other method of electronic access, which 1157 may include information regarding the patientâs medical history, 1158 medical condition, medical treatment, laboratory results, 1159 diagnostic reports, and clinical notes. 1160 (d)ââEmergency health care serviceâ has the same meaning as 1161 âemergency services and careâ as defined in s. 641.19. 1162 (e)ââEnrollee ineligibilityâ means that the enrollee was no 1163 longer enrolled in the health maintenance organization at the 1164 time of receiving the applicable service. 1165 (f)ââOverpaymentâ means payment made upon a claim that is: 1166 1.âBilled in error; 1167 2.âA duplicate claim; or 1168 3.âBilled for a service rendered to a patient despite 1169 enrollee ineligibility. 1170 1171 A request for overpayment is limited to a billing error, 1172 duplicate bill, or enrollee ineligibility. 1173 (2)âAll claims for payment or overpayment, whether 1174 electronic or nonelectronic: 1175 (a)âAre considered received on the date the claim is 1176 received by the health maintenance organization at its 1177 designated claims-receipt location or the date the overpayment a 1178 claim for overpayment is received by the provider at its 1179 designated location. 1180 (b)âAs to providersâ claims for payment, must be mailed or 1181 electronically transferred to the primary organization within 6 1182 months after the following have occurred: 1183 1.âDischarge for inpatient services or the date of service 1184 for outpatient services; and 1185 2.âThe provider has been furnished with the correct name 1186 and address of the patientâs health maintenance organization. 1187 1188 All providersâ claims for payment, whether electronic or 1189 nonelectronic, must be mailed or electronically transferred to 1190 the secondary organization within 45 90 days after final 1191 determination by the primary organization. A providerâs claim is 1192 considered submitted on the date it is electronically 1193 transferred or mailed. 1194 (c)âMust not duplicate a claim previously submitted unless 1195 it is determined that the original claim was not received or is 1196 otherwise lost. 1197 (3)âFor all electronically submitted claims, a health 1198 maintenance organization shall: 1199 (a)âWithin 24 hours after the beginning of the next 1200 business day after receipt of the claim, provide to the 1201 electronic source submitting the claim an electronic 1202 acknowledgment of the receipt of the claim, accompanied by a 1203 statement indicating the health maintenance organizationâs 1204 position as to whether the claim is a clean claim or whether the 1205 claim is missing any information that is required under the 1206 applicable electronic billing instrument described in paragraph 1207 (1)(a) or that was reasonably required by the health maintenance 1208 organization, other than for emergency health care services, in 1209 advance of the provision of service to substantiate to the 1210 electronic source submitting the claim, and the health 1211 maintenance organization asserts is missing as of the date of 1212 service. 1213 (b)âWithin 15 20 days after receipt of the claim, pay the 1214 claim or notify a provider or designee if a claim is denied or 1215 contested. Notice of the health maintenance organizationâs 1216 action on the claim and payment of the claim is considered to be 1217 made on the date the notice or payment was received by the 1218 provider mailed or electronically transferred. 1219 (c)1.âNotification of the health maintenance organizationâs 1220 determination of a contested claim must be accompanied by an 1221 itemized list of any additional information required under the 1222 applicable billing instrument described in paragraph (1)(a) or 1223 that was reasonably required by the health maintenance 1224 organization, other than for emergency health care services, in 1225 advance of the provision of service to substantiate the claim, 1226 and the health maintenance organization asserts is missing as of 1227 the date of such service or documents the insurer can reasonably 1228 determine are necessary to process the claim. 1229 2.âA provider must submit the additional information or 1230 documentation, as specified on the itemized list, within 30 35 1231 days after receipt of the notification of contestation unless, 1232 within the 30-day period, the provider notifies the health 1233 maintenance organization of the providerâs position that a clean 1234 claim has been submitted. Additional information is considered 1235 submitted on the date it is electronically transferred or 1236 mailed. The health maintenance organization is prohibited from 1237 requesting may not request duplicate documents. 1238 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, electronic means of 1239 transmission of claims, notices, documents, forms, and payment 1240 shall be used to the greatest extent possible by the health 1241 maintenance organization and the provider. 1242 (e)âA claim contested by the health maintenance 1243 organization must be paid or denied within 30 90 days after 1244 receipt of the additional information requested claim. Failure 1245 to pay or deny a claim within 90 120 days after receipt of the 1246 claim, regardless of whether contested by the health maintenance 1247 organization, creates an uncontestable obligation to pay the 1248 claim. 1249 (4)âFor all nonelectronically submitted claims, a health 1250 maintenance organization shall: 1251 (a)âWithin 15 days following receipt of the claim Effective 1252 November 1, 2003, provide to the provider, or designee, who 1253 submitted the claim: 1254 1.âAn acknowledgment of receipt of the claim, accompanied 1255 by a statement indicating the health maintenance organizationâs 1256 position as to whether the claim is a clean claim or the claim 1257 is missing any information that is required under the applicable 1258 paper billing form, as described in paragraph (1)(a), or that 1259 was reasonably required by the health maintenance organization, 1260 other than for emergency health care services, in advance of the 1261 provision of service to substantiate the claim, and the health 1262 maintenance organization asserts is missing as of the date of 1263 service; or 1264 2.âwithin 15 days after receipt of the claim to the 1265 provider or designee or provide a provider or designee within 15 1266 days after receipt with Electronic access to the status of the a 1267 submitted claim, which status must indicate the health 1268 maintenance organizationâs position as to whether the claim is a 1269 clean claim or missing any information described in subparagraph 1270 1. 1271 (b)âWithin 30 40 days after receipt of the claim, pay the 1272 claim or notify a provider or designee if a claim is denied or 1273 contested. Notice of the health maintenance organizationâs 1274 action on the claim and payment of the claim is considered to be 1275 made on the date the notice or payment was received by the 1276 provider mailed or electronically transferred. 1277 (c)1.âNotification of the health maintenance organizationâs 1278 determination of a contested claim must be accompanied by an 1279 itemized list of any additional information required under the 1280 applicable form or billing instrument described in paragraph 1281 (1)(a), or that was reasonably required by the health 1282 maintenance organization, other than for emergency health care 1283 services, in advance of the provision of service to substantiate 1284 the claim, and the health maintenance organization asserts is 1285 missing as of the date of such service or documents the 1286 organization can reasonably determine are necessary to process 1287 the claim. 1288 2.âA provider must submit the additional information or 1289 documentation, as specified on the itemized list, within 30 35 1290 days after receipt of the notification of contestation unless, 1291 within the 30-day period, the provider notifies the health 1292 maintenance organization of the providerâs position that a clean 1293 claim has been submitted. Additional information is considered 1294 submitted on the date it is electronically transferred or 1295 mailed. The health maintenance organization is prohibited from 1296 requesting may not request duplicate documents. 1297 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, electronic means of 1298 transmission of claims, notices, documents, forms, and payments 1299 must shall be used to the greatest extent possible by the health 1300 maintenance organization and the provider. 1301 (e)âA claim contested by the health maintenance 1302 organization must be paid or denied within 30 120 days after 1303 receipt of the additional information requested claim. Failure 1304 to pay or deny a claim within 90 140 days after receipt of the 1305 claim, regardless of whether contested by the health maintenance 1306 organization, creates an uncontestable obligation to pay the 1307 claim as submitted by the provider. 1308 (5)âRegardless of whether a claim has been submitted 1309 electronically or nonelectronically, and notwithstanding any 1310 other provision of this section: 1311 (a)âOnce a provider grants a health maintenance 1312 organization access to a patientâs electronic medical record, 1313 the provider is deemed to have supplied all information 1314 necessary to pay the claim, including, without limitation, all 1315 information that is required under the applicable billing 1316 instrument and that was reasonably required by the health 1317 maintenance organization, other than for emergency health care 1318 services, in advance of the provision of service to substantiate 1319 the claim. Additional information or documentation, regardless 1320 of whether the health maintenance organization requests any 1321 additional information, is deemed unnecessary and deemed not 1322 required for payment of the claim, and any request for 1323 additional information, and any position of the health 1324 maintenance organization or any third party acting on behalf of 1325 the health maintenance organization regarding any lack of 1326 information from the provider, is prohibited from being used to 1327 deny, reduce, offset, withhold, pend, or delay payment of the 1328 claim. 1329 (b)âIf notice of access to the electronic medical record 1330 has been provided to the health maintenance organization, the 1331 claim must be paid or denied within 30 days of such notice to 1332 the health maintenance organization. Failure to pay or deny a 1333 claim, for which the health maintenance organization has been 1334 provided notice of access to the electronic medical record 1335 within 75 days after receipt of such notice, creates an 1336 uncontestable obligation to pay the claim as submitted by the 1337 provider. 1338 (6)(5)âIf a health maintenance organization determines that 1339 it has made an overpayment to a provider for services rendered 1340 to an enrollee a subscriber, the health maintenance organization 1341 must make an overpayment a claim for such overpayment to the 1342 providerâs designated location. A health maintenance 1343 organization that makes an overpayment a claim for overpayment 1344 to a provider under this section shall give the provider a 1345 written or electronic statement specifying the basis for the 1346 retrospective retroactive denial or payment adjustment. The 1347 health maintenance organization must also identify the claim or 1348 claims, or overpayment claim portion thereof, as to which the 1349 health maintenance organization alleges overpayment, and the 1350 specific invoice number submitted with or on the claim, as well 1351 as the specific line items on the bill that are subject to the 1352 overpayment claim for which a claim for overpayment is 1353 submitted. Except as provided in subparagraph (a)3., there may 1354 be no denial, reduction, offset, withholding, pending, or delay 1355 of payment, or other negative impact, regardless of whether by 1356 the health maintenance organization or any third party acting on 1357 behalf of such health maintenance organization, on payment of 1358 any other claim of the provider on the basis of the overpayment 1359 allegation. 1360 (a)âIf an overpayment determination is the result of 1361 retrospective retroactive review or retrospective audit of 1362 coverage decisions or payment levels not related to fraud, a 1363 health maintenance organization must shall adhere to the 1364 following procedures: 1365 1.âAll overpayment claims for overpayment must be received 1366 by the submitted to a provider within 18 30 months after the 1367 health maintenance organizationâs payment of the claim. A 1368 provider must pay, deny, or contest the health maintenance 1369 organizationâs overpayment claim for overpayment within 40 days 1370 after the receipt of the overpayment claim. All contested 1371 overpayment claims for overpayment must be paid or denied within 1372 120 days after receipt of the overpayment claim. Failure to pay 1373 or deny an overpayment and claim within 140 days after receipt 1374 creates an uncontestable obligation to pay the overpayment 1375 claim. 1376 2.âA provider that denies or contests a health maintenance 1377 organizationâs overpayment claim for overpayment or any portion 1378 of an overpayment a claim shall notify the health maintenance 1379 organization, in writing, within 40 35 days after the provider 1380 receives the overpayment claim that the overpayment claim for 1381 overpayment is contested or denied. The notice that the 1382 overpayment claim for overpayment is denied or contested must 1383 identify the denied or contested portion of the claim and the 1384 specific reason for contesting or denying the overpayment claim 1385 and, if contested, must include a request for additional 1386 information. If the health maintenance organization submits 1387 additional information, the health maintenance organization 1388 must, within 35 days after receipt of the request, mail or 1389 electronically transfer the information to the provider. The 1390 provider shall pay or deny the overpayment claim for overpayment 1391 within 45 days after receipt of the information. The notice from 1392 the provider regarding denial or contestation of the overpayment 1393 claim is considered made on the date the notice is mailed or 1394 electronically transferred by the provider. 1395 3.âThe health maintenance organization is prohibited from 1396 denying, reducing, offsetting, withholding, pending, or delaying 1397 may not reduce payment to the provider for other services unless 1398 the provider agrees to the denial, reduction, offset, 1399 withholding, pending, or delay of payment in writing or fails to 1400 respond to the health maintenance organizationâs overpayment 1401 claim as required by this paragraph. 1402 4.âPayment of an overpayment claim is considered made on 1403 the date the payment was mailed or electronically transferred. 1404 An overdue payment of a claim bears simple interest at the rate 1405 of 12 percent per year. Interest on an overdue payment for an 1406 overpayment a claim for an overpayment payment begins to accrue 1407 when the overpayment claim should have been paid, denied, or 1408 contested. 1409 (b)âAn overpayment A claim is prohibited for overpayment 1410 shall not be permitted beyond 18 30 months after the health 1411 maintenance organizationâs payment of a claim, except that 1412 overpayment claims for overpayment may be sought beyond that 1413 time from providers convicted of fraud pursuant to s. 817.234. 1414 (7)(6)âPayment of a claim is considered made on the date 1415 the payment was mailed or electronically transferred to the 1416 provider. An overdue payment of a claim bears simple interest of 1417 15 12 percent per year, to be calculated on the full total 1418 amount that should have been paid on the claim within the 1419 applicable time period specified in this section. If an 1420 applicable court, arbitration tribunal, or other binding legal 1421 process determines that a claim that was paid at a lesser amount 1422 should have been paid at a full total amount, whether under a 1423 breach of contract legal claim, a legal claim under a statutory 1424 private cause of action, or other basis, the 15 percent per year 1425 interest must be calculated on the full total amount, rather 1426 than upon the difference between the full total amount and the 1427 amount that was actually paid. If an applicable court, 1428 arbitration tribunal, or other binding legal process determines 1429 that a claim was subject to an inappropriate or impermissible 1430 denial or partial denial, whether in a breach of contract, 1431 statute, common law, or otherwise, interest must be calculated 1432 on the full total amount that should have been paid on the claim 1433 within the applicable time period for payment specified in this 1434 section, and the act of denial or partial denial is deemed not 1435 to have in any way tolled the time period for such payment. 1436 Interest on the full total amount that should have been paid on 1437 the claim within the applicable time period specified in this 1438 section an overdue payment for a claim or for any portion of a 1439 claim begins to accrue when the claim should have been paid, 1440 denied, or contested. The interest must be paid along with, and 1441 in addition to, the payment for the satisfaction of the full 1442 total amount of the claim, as determined by an applicable court, 1443 arbitration tribunal, or other binding legal process is payable 1444 with the payment of the claim. 1445 (8)(7)âFor all contracts entered into or renewed on or 1446 after October 1, 2002, a health maintenance organizationâs 1447 internal dispute resolution process related to a denied claim 1448 not under active review by a mediator, arbitrator, or third 1449 party dispute entity must be finalized within 60 days after the 1450 receipt of the providerâs request for review or appeal. 1451 Notwithstanding any provision of this section, if the provider 1452 and health maintenance organization disagree as to the 1453 interpretation of contractual or statutory language, the 1454 provider is not required to participate in the health 1455 maintenance organizationâs internal dispute resolution process. 1456 (9)(8)âA provider or any representative of a provider, 1457 regardless of whether the provider is under contract with the 1458 health maintenance organization, is prohibited from collecting 1459 or attempting may not collect or attempt to collect money from, 1460 maintaining maintain any action at law against, or reporting 1461 report to a credit agency an enrollee a subscriber for payment 1462 of covered services for which the health maintenance 1463 organization contested or denied the providerâs claim. This 1464 prohibition applies during the pendency of any claim for payment 1465 made by the provider to the health maintenance organization for 1466 payment of the services or internal dispute resolution process 1467 to determine whether the health maintenance organization is 1468 liable for the services. For a claim, this pendency applies from 1469 the date the claim or a portion of the claim is denied to the 1470 date of the completion of the health maintenance organizationâs 1471 internal dispute resolution process, not to exceed 60 days. This 1472 subsection does not prohibit collection by the provider of 1473 copayments, coinsurance, or deductible amounts due the provider. 1474 (9)âThe provisions of this section may not be waived, 1475 voided, or nullified by contract. 1476 (10)âA health maintenance organization is prohibited from 1477 retrospectively denying may not retroactively deny a claim 1478 because of enrollee subscriber ineligibility more than 90 days 1 1479 year after the date of payment of the claim. 1480 (11)âA health maintenance organization must shall pay a 1481 contracted primary care or admitting physician, pursuant to such 1482 physicianâs contract, for providing inpatient services in a 1483 contracted hospital to an enrollee a subscriber if such services 1484 are determined by the primary care physician or admitting 1485 physician health maintenance organization to be medically 1486 necessary and such services are covered services under the 1487 health maintenance organizationâs contract with the contract 1488 holder. 1489 (12)âA permissible error ratio of 5 percent is established 1490 for health maintenance organizationsâ claims payment violations 1491 of paragraphs (3)(a), (b), (c), and (e) and (4)(a), (b), (c), 1492 and (e). If the error ratio of a particular health maintenance 1493 organization insurer does not exceed the permissible error ratio 1494 of 5 percent for an audit period, no fine may shall be assessed 1495 for the noted claims violations for the audit period. The error 1496 ratio is shall be determined by dividing the number of claims 1497 with violations found on a statistically valid sample of claims 1498 for the audit period by the total number of claims in the 1499 sample. If the error ratio exceeds the permissible error ratio 1500 of 5 percent, a fine may be assessed according to s. 624.4211 1501 for those claims payment violations which exceed the error 1502 ratio. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the 1503 office may fine a health maintenance organization for claims 1504 payment violations of paragraphs (3)(e) and (4)(e) which create 1505 an uncontestable obligation to pay the claim as submitted by the 1506 provider. The office shall refrain from imposing a not fine upon 1507 a health maintenance organization organizations for violations 1508 which the office determines were due to circumstances beyond the 1509 organizationâs control. 1510 (13)âThis section applies shall apply to all claims or any 1511 portion of a claim submitted for payment for services provided 1512 to an enrollee by a health maintenance organization subscriber 1513 under a health maintenance organization plan, or submitted for 1514 payment for services provided to an enrollee under a self 1515 insured plan or fund, or fully-insured plan or fund, offered by 1516 a person or an entity, when a health maintenance organization is 1517 involved in the administration, or claims-processing activities, 1518 relating to such plan or fund subscriber contract to the 1519 organization for payment. 1520 (14)âNotwithstanding paragraph (3)(b), where an electronic 1521 pharmacy claim is submitted to a pharmacy benefits manager 1522 acting on behalf of a health maintenance organization, the 1523 pharmacy benefits manager must shall, within 30 days after of 1524 receipt of the claim, pay the claim or notify a provider or 1525 designee if a claim is denied or contested. Notice of the health 1526 maintenance organizationâs action on the claim and payment of 1527 the claim is considered to be made on the date the notice or 1528 payment was received by the provider mailed or electronically 1529 transferred. 1530 (15)âNotwithstanding paragraph (4)(a), effective November 1531 1, 2003, where a nonelectronic pharmacy claim is submitted to a 1532 pharmacy benefits manager acting on behalf of a health 1533 maintenance organization, the pharmacy benefits manager shall 1534 provide acknowledgment of receipt of the claim within 30 days 1535 after receipt of the claim to the provider or provide a provider 1536 within 30 days after receipt with electronic access to the 1537 status of a submitted claim. 1538 (16)âNotwithstanding the 18-month 30-month period provided 1539 in subsection (6) (5), all claims for overpayment submitted to a 1540 provider licensed under chapter 395, chapter 458, chapter 459, 1541 chapter 460, chapter 461, chapter 463, chapter 466, or chapter 1542 490 must be submitted to the provider within 12 months after the 1543 health maintenance organizationâs payment of the claim. An 1544 overpayment A claim to a provider licensed under chapter 395, 1545 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, chapter 463, chapter 1546 466, or chapter 490 is prohibited for overpayment may not be 1547 permitted beyond 12 months after the health maintenance 1548 organizationâs payment of a claim, except that claims for 1549 overpayment may be sought beyond that time from providers 1550 convicted of fraud pursuant to s. 817.234. 1551 (17)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, 1552 all claims for underpayment from a provider licensed under 1553 chapter 395, chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, 1554 or chapter 466 must be submitted to the health maintenance 1555 organization within 12 months after the health maintenance 1556 organizationâs payment of the claim. A claim for underpayment by 1557 a provider licensed under chapter 395, chapter 458, chapter 459, 1558 chapter 460, chapter 461, or chapter 466 is prohibited may not 1559 be permitted beyond 12 months after the health maintenance 1560 organizationâs payment of a claim. 1561 (18)âNothing in this section may be interpreted to limit, 1562 restrict, or negatively impact any legal claim by a provider or 1563 health maintenance organization for breach of contract, 1564 statutory or regulatory violation, or a common-law cause of 1565 action, nor to shorten or otherwise negatively impact the 1566 statute of limitations timeframe for bringing any such legal 1567 claim. 1568 (19)âA health insurer is prohibited from requesting 1569 information from a contracted or noncontracted provider which 1570 does not apply to the medical condition at issue for the 1571 purposes of adjudicating a clean claim. 1572 (20)âA health maintenance organization is prohibited from 1573 requesting a contracted or noncontracted provider to resubmit 1574 claim information that the contracted or noncontracted provider 1575 can document it has already provided to the health maintenance 1576 organization or that is contained inside the electronic medical 1577 record to which the health maintenance organization has been 1578 provided access. 1579 (21)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, a 1580 health maintenance organization is prohibited from requiring any 1581 information from a provider before the provision of emergency 1582 health care services as a condition of payment of a claim, as a 1583 basis for denying, delaying, offsetting, withholding, or 1584 reducing payment of a claim, or in contesting whether the claim 1585 is a clean claim. 1586 (22)âFor a violation of this section, a provider shall have 1587 a private cause of action to proceed against the health 1588 maintenance organization in the applicable tribunal for the 1589 violation. 1590 Section 5.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 1591 395.1065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1592 395.1065âCriminal and administrative penalties; 1593 moratorium.â 1594 (2) 1595 (c)âThe agency may impose an administrative fine for the 1596 violation of s. 641.3154 or, if sufficient claims due to a 1597 provider from a health maintenance organization do not exist to 1598 enable the take-back of an overpayment, as provided under s. 1599 641.3155(6) s. 641.3155(5), for the violation of s. 641.3155(6) 1600 s. 641.3155(5). The administrative fine for a violation cited in 1601 this paragraph shall be in the amounts specified in s. 1602 641.52(5), and the provisions of paragraph (a) do not apply. 1603 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.